sv: Delikat köttsort: Bacon; Bologna; Sprängd biff; Skinka; Mortadella; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Rostbiff; Salami; Övrigt
vi: Loại thịt nguội: Thịt lợn muối xông khói; Xúc xích Bologna; Bò muối; Giăm bông; Xúc xích Mortadella; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Thịt nguội Prosciutto; Thịt bò nướng; Xúc xích Salami; Khác
bg-BG: Разнообразие от месни деликатеси: Бекон; Болоня; Осолено говеждо месо; Шунка; Мортадела; Пастърма; Пеперони; Прошуто; Ростбиф; Салам; Друго
el: Ποικιλία αλλαντικών ντελικατέσεν: Μπέικον; Πάριζα; Κορν μπιφ; Ζαμπόν; Μορταδέλα; Παστράμι; Πεπερόνι; Προσούτο; Ροστ μπιφ; Σαλάμι; Άλλο
sl-SI: Raznolikost delikatesnega mesa: Slanina; Bolonjska klobasa; Soljena govedina; Šunka; Mortadela; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Pršut; Roastbeef; Salama; Drugo
en: Deli meat variety: Bacon; Bologna; Corned beef; Ham; Mortadella; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Roast beef; Salami; Other
hu: Felvágott választék: Szalonna; Párizsi; Pácolt marhahús; Sonka; Mortadella; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Roastbeef; Szalámi; Egyéb
fr: Variété de charcuterie: Bacon; Bologne; Corned-beef; Jambon; Mortadelle; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Rosbif; Salami; Autre
fi: Leikkelelajike: Pekoni; Bologna; Suolaliha; Kinkku; Mortadella; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Paahtopaisti; Salami; Muu
ru: Вид деликатесного мясного изделия: Бекон; Болонья; Корн-биф; Ветчина; Мортаделла; Пастрами; Пепперони; Прошутто; Ростбиф; Салями; Другое
sk-SK: Druh údeniny: Slanina; Bolonská saláma; Corned beef; Šunka; Mortadella; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Roast beef; Saláma; Iné
th: เนื้อเดลี่หลากหลายชนิด: เบคอน; โบโลญญา; คอร์นบีฟ; แฮม; มอร์ตาเดลลา; พาสตรามี; เปปเปอโรนี; โพรชูตโต; เนื้ออบ; ซาลามี; อื่นๆ
de: Wurstwaren-Sortiment: Bacon; Fleischwurst; Corned Beef; Schinken; Mortadella; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Roastbeef; Salami; Sonstige
pt-PT: Variedade de frios: Bacon; Mortadela de Bolonha; Carne de vaca salgada; Fiambre; Mortadela; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Presunto; Rosbife; Salame; Outro
ja: デリミートの種類: ベーコン; ボローニャ; コンビーフ; ハム; モルタデッラ; パストラミ; ペパロニ; プロシュート; ローストビーフ; サラミ; その他
pl: Odmiana wędliny delikatesowej: Boczek; Kiełbasa bolońska; Peklowana wołowina; Szynka; Mortadela; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Rostbef; Salami; Inne
it: Varietà di salumi: Bacon; Bologna; Corned beef; Prosciutto cotto; Mortadella; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto crudo; Roast beef; Salame; Altra
pt-BR: Variedade de frios: Bacon; Bolonha; Corned beef; Presunto; Mortadela; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Rosbife; Salame; Outro
da: Kødvarianter fra delikatesseforretningen: Bacon; Bolognapølse; Sprængt oksekød; Skinke; Mortadella; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Roastbeef; Salami; Andet
nl: Delicatessenvlees variant: Spek; Bologna; Cornedbeef; Ham; Mortadella; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Rosbief; Salami; Overige
lt-LT: Delikatesinės mėsos rūšis: Šoninė; Bolonijos dešra; Sūdyta jautiena; Kumpis; Mortadela; Pastramis; Peperoni dešra; Prošiutas; Kepta jautiena; Saliamis; Kita
zh-CN: 熟食肉类品种: 培根; 博洛尼亚香肠; 腌牛肉; 火腿; 意式肉肠 (Mortadella); 熏肉 (Pastrami); 意大利辣香肠 (Pepperoni); 意大利熏火腿 (Prosciutto); 烤牛肉; 萨拉米香肠; 其他
zh-TW: 熟食肉類種類: 培根; 波隆那香腸; 醃牛肉; 火腿; 義式肉腸; 煙燻肉; 義大利辣香腸; 義大利生火腿; 烤牛肉; 薩拉米香腸; 其他
ro-RO: Varietate de mezeluri: Bacon; Parizer Bologna; Carne de vită conservată; Șuncă; Mortadella; Pastramă; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Roast beef; Salam; Altele
es: Variedad del embutido: Tocino; Bolonia; Corned beef; Jamón; Mortadela; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Roast beef; Salami; Otro
cs: Druh lahůdkového masa/uzeniny: Slanina; Boloňský salám; Nakládané hovězí; Šunka; Mortadela; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Roastbeef; Salám; Jiné
tr: Şarküteri eti çeşitleri: Bacon; Bologna; Konserve sığır eti; Jambon; Mortadella; Pastırma; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Rozbif; Salam; Diğer
ko: 델리 육류 종류: 베이컨; 볼로냐; 콘비프; 햄; 모르타델라; 파스트라미; 페퍼로니; 프로슈토; 로스트비프; 살라미; 기타
nb: Utvalg av delikatesseforretninger: Bacon; Bologna; Corned beef; Skinke; Mortadella; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Prosciutto; Roastbiff; Salami; Annet
hr-HR: Raznolikost delikatesnog mesa: Slanina; Bolonjska kobasica; Usoljena govedina; Šunka; Mortadela; Pastrami; Pepperoni; Pršut; Rostbif; Salama; Ostalo